Alabama, session 2026rs, HB254.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) A law enforcement officer may not stop
or board a vessel for the sole purpose of performing a safety
inspection or marine sanitation equipment inspection.
(b) For the purposes of this section, the term "vessel"
has the meaning as defined in Section 33-5-3, Code of Alabama
1975.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on June 1,
2026.
Page 1

2026.
HB254 Enrolled









________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House, as amended 03-Feb-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 26-Feb-26 Passed



Page 2